Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-120
Drainage improvements; uncompleted contract; reletting; conditions.

Any contract not completed within the time specified shall be reestimated and relet to the lowest responsible bidder, but not for a sum greater than the estimate, nor a second time to the same party; Provided, the county board, may for a good cause, extend the time of any contractors not to exceed two years.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 20, p. 243;

Laws 1885, c. 94, § 1, p. 373;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 20, p. 460;

R.S.1913, § 1737;

C.S.1922, § 1684;

C.S.1929, § 31-120;

R.S.1943, § 31-120.

In absence of fraud, contract is valid though there was only one bid. Gutschow v. Washington County, 74 Neb. 378, 104 N.W. 602 (1905).

Section is directory, and is not exclusive means of ascertaining damages. McDonald v. Dodge County, 41 Neb. 905, 60 N.W. 366 (1894).